Maryland, session 2025, SB0147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
6.5–201.
There is a State Board of Stationary Engineers in the Department.
6.5–202.
(a) (1) The Board consists of eight members appointed by the Governor with
the advice of the Secretary and THE ADVICE AND CONSENT OF the Senate.
(2) Of the eight members of the Board:
(i) three shall be stationary engineers;
(ii) one shall be a representative from the boiler manufacture and
design industry;
(iii) one shall be a boiler owner;
– 1 –

Ch. 361 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) two shall be consumer members; and
(v) one shall be the Chief Boiler Inspector of the State, or the Chief
Boiler Inspector’s designee, who shall be an ex officio, nonvoting member of the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –